it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Attrezzi per mani: Attrezzi per estensione ed esercizio delle dita; Anelli per la presa e palline antistress; Attrezzi giroscopici per le mani; Pinze per la presa; Barre flessibili power twister
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Rankų treniruokliai: Pirštų tiesiamųjų raumenų treniruokliai ir tempikliai; Rankų žiedai ir streso kamuoliukai; Giroskopiniai rankų treniruokliai; Rankų griebtuvai; Jėgos spyruokliniai treniruokliai
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 手部锻炼器材: 伸指训练器; 握力圈与减压球; 腕力球; 握力器; 臂力棒
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Thiết bị/dụng cụ tập bàn tay: Dụng cụ tập kéo giãn ngón tay; Vòng bóp tay & bóng giảm căng thẳng; Bóng tập cổ tay Gyro; Kìm bóp tay; Thanh bẻ tập lực tay
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Käsipuristimet: Sormien ojentajien harjoitteluvälineet; Puristusrenkaat ja stressipallot; Gyroskooppiset rannepallot; Puristusvoiman harjoituslaitteet; Vääntöjouset
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Ejercitadores para manos: Ejercitadores y estiradores de extensores de dedos; Anillos de agarre y pelotas antiestrés; Ejercitadores de mano giroscópicos; Fortalecedores de agarre de mano; Barras flexibles de resistencia
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Ściskacze do rąk: Trenażery prostowników palców; Kółka do ściskania i piłeczki antystresowe; Żyroskopowe trenażery dłoni; Ściskacze do rąk; Sprężyny treningowe
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Håndtrener: Fingerstrekkere og trening for fingerekstensorer; Griperinger og stressballer; Gyroskopiske håndtrenere; Håndgripere; Bøyestenger
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Cvičební pomůcky na ruce: Posilovače a natahovače prstů; Posilovací kroužky a antistresové míčky; Gyroskopické posilovače rukou; Posilovače úchopu; Posilovací ohýbací pružiny
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > 握力・手首トレーニング器具: フィンガーエクステンサー・ストレッチャー; グリップリング・ストレスボール; ジャイロスコープ式ハンドエクササイザー; ハンドグリッパー; パワーツイスターバー
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Vadbena orodja za roke: Vadbeni pripomočki za raztegovanje prstov in raztegovalniki za prste; Obročki za oprijem in žogice za lajšanje stresa; Žiroskopski vadbeni pripomočki za roke; Stiskalniki za dlani; Palice Power Twister za uvijanje
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Exercitadores de mãos: Exercitadores e extensores de dedos; Argolas de aderência e bolas anti-stress; Exercitadores de mão giroscópicos; Fortalecedores de aderência; Barras de mola
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 악력기: 손가락 신전근 운동기 및 스트레칭기; 악력 링 및 스트레스 볼; 자이로스코프 악력기; 악력기; 완력기
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Aparate de exerciții pentru mâini: Extensoare și dispozitive de stretching pentru degete; Inele și mingi de stres pentru aderență; Giroscoape pentru exerciții de mână; Clești pentru mână; Bare power twister
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > El Egzersiz Aletleri: Parmak güçlendiriciler ve esneticiler; Kavrama halkaları ve stres topları; Jiroskopik el egzersiz aletleri; El yayları; Bükme yayları
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Упражнения за ръце: Уреди и разтягачи за разгъване на пръсти; Пръстени за захват и антистрес топки; Жироскопични тренажори за ръце; Тренажори за захват; Силови пружинни лостове
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Kézedzők: Ujjfeszítő erősítők és nyújtók; Markolaterősítő gyűrűk és stresszlabdák; Giroszkópos kézerősítők; Marokerősítők; Hajlítórugók
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Эспандеры для рук: Тренажеры для пальцев и эспандеры-разгибатели; Эспандеры-кольца и мячи-антистресс; Гироскопические кистевые эспандеры; Кистевые эспандеры; Эспандеры-палки (твистеры)
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Εξοπλισμός ενδυνάμωσης χεριών: Όργανα έκτασης και διάτασης δαχτύλων; Κρίκοι ενδυνάμωσης και μπαλάκια κατά του στρες; Γυροσκοπικά όργανα εξάσκησης χεριών; Λαβές ενδυνάμωσης χεριών; Μπάρες ελατηρίου
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Appareils d’exercice pour les mains: Exerciseurs et extenseurs de doigts; Anneaux de renforcement et balles anti-stress; Exerciseurs de main gyroscopiques; Poignées de musculation; Barres de torsion
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Handtrainers: Vingerextensortrainers en -stretchers; Knijpringen en stressballen; Gyroscopische handtrainers; Handgrippers; Buigveren
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Exercícios manuais: Exercitadores e extensores de dedos; Anéis fortalecedores e bolas antiestresse; Exercitadores de mão giroscópicos; Hand grips; Barras flexíveis de tensão
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Ručné zariadenia na cvičenie: Prístroje na posilňovanie a strečing extenzorov prstov; Posilňovacie krúžky a stresové loptičky; Gyroskopické posilňovače rúk; Ručné posilňovače; Posilňovacie tyče Power Twister
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Handtrainer: Fingerstrecker & -dehner; Grip-Ringe & Stressbälle; Gyroskopische Handtrainer; Hand-Gripper; Biegehanteln
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Handstärkare: Fingertränare och extensorband; Greppringar och stressbollar; Gyroskopiska handtränare; Grepptränare; Böjfjädrar
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Sprave za vježbanje ruku: Sprave za vježbanje i istezanje ekstenzora prstiju; Prstenovi za hvat i loptice za stres; Žiroskopske sprave za vježbanje ruku; Hvatači za ruke; Pregibna šipka s oprugom
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 手部運動器材: 手指伸展訓練器; 握力圈與紓壓球; 陀螺儀腕力球; 握力器; 臂力器
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Hand Exercisers: Finger Extensor Exercisers & Stretchers; Grip Rings & Stress Balls; Gyroscopic Hand Exercisers; Hand Grippers; Power Twister Bars
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Motionsapparater til hænderne: Fingertrænere og -strækkere; Håndtræningsringe og stressbolde; Gyroskopiske håndtrænere; Håndtrænere; Bøjestænger (power twisters)
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ที่ออกกำลังสำหรับมือ: อุปกรณ์ฝึกบริหารและยืดนิ้วมือ; ห่วงยางบริหารมือและลูกบอลบีบคลายเครียด; ลูกบอลบริหารข้อมือไจโรสโคป; เครื่องบริหารกริปมือ; สปริงดัดแขน